Missouri, session 2026, HB2770.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 273.100, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[273.100. 1. Every city or town marshal of every incorporated city or
town in this state, within their jurisdiction, shall take up and impound in a
suitable place, the location of which place shall be given by a notice posted in
some conspicuous place in his office, all dogs found running at large in their
respective cities or towns without collars around their necks, marked as herein
provided, and they shall keep such dogs for a period of one week, and at the
expiration of such period shall put such dogs to death by humane methods.
2. The owner of any such impounded dogs, upon the payment of the
tax herein provided, and a redemption fee of five dollars, may redeem such
impounded dog and the city or town marshal shall be permitted to retain the
sum of two dollars out of each redemption fee so paid, and shall pay over the
balance of the fee on the first day of each month to the treasurer of the county
in which the city or town marshal has jurisdiction, to be accounted for by the
treasurers in the same manner as they are required by sections 273.040 to
273.180, to account for licenses taxes.
3. Any marshal who shall fail or refuse to take up and impound any
such dog shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof fined not
less than five dollars nor more than twenty-five dollars.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.